Hawaii, session 2026, SB34.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Attendance; mental health; excused absence.  The department shall identify an absence due to the mental or behavioral health of a student as an excused absence.  Not more than excused absences due to the mental or behavioral health of a student may be taken by a student each academic year. For the purposes of this section, "excused absence" means an absence identified by the department as exempt from penalties relating to the failure of a student to meet the requirements for regular attendance at school." SECTION 2.  Section 302A-1136, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§302A-1136[]] Enforcement.  (a)  The department shall be charged with the enforcement of sections 302A-1132 to 302A‑1135.  Nothing in this section shall relieve any chief of police or police officer of the chief's or officer's responsibility for the enforcement of these sections, but their enforcement shall be subject to the plans and policies of the department. (b) An absence by a student due to the mental health of the student shall be exempted from this section." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________